Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1569.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 54AMATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAMSec.54A01. Definitions.54A02. Establishment of pilot program.54A03. Administration of pilot program.54A04. Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes requirements.54A05. Requirements for contracts with participating managed care organizations.54A06. Implementation of pilot program.123456789101112131415161718 54A07. Fee payment for administration of pilot program.54A08. Operation of pilot program.54A09. Report.54A10. Expiration of authority.§ 54A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible participant." A patient who is:(1) a recipient of medical assistance;(2) a member of a participating managed care organization; and(3) pregnant."Health care provider." An obstetrician or maternal fetal medicine physician who is:(1) Licensed in this Commonwealth.(2) In-network of a participating managed care organization.(3) Caring for an eligible participant during pregnancy."Nursing team." A group made up of health care providers that can provide nutrition and diabetes management counseling and advice."Participating managed care organization." The managed care organizations selected by the department under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program). Each participating managed care organization shall:(1) Contract directly with the selected vendor to offer remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes to eligible participants.20250HB1569PN1858 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Ensure that eligible patients have access to the pilot program."Pilot program." The Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program established under section 54A02 (relating to establishment of pilot program)."Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes." Technology provided by the selected vendor that:(1) Collects health data from an eligible participant and electronically transmits the information securely for interpretation and recommendation.(2) Uses a device that meets all of the following criteria:(i) The device is compliant with 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XI Pt. C (relating to administrative simplification).(ii) The device is authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration.(3) Monitors health data, including blood pressure, weight, blood glucose levels or other physiologic health data as determined by the eligible participant's health care provider.(4) Is capable of transmitting health data through cellular networks."Selected vendor." The technology vendor selected by the department under section 54A03 to contract with the participating managed care organizations in administering the pilot program.§ 54A02. Establishment of pilot program.The Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program is established 20250HB1569PN1858 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within the department to offer eligible participants improved maternal health care through remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes.§ 54A03. Administration of pilot program.The department shall select one or more participating managed care organizations and one technology vendor to administer the pilot program in a manner determined by the department.§ 54A04. Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes requirements.The participating managed care organizations shall meet the following requirements when offering remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes to an eligible participant under the pilot program:(1) Ensure that remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes is possible during pregnancy and for up to three months postpartum.(2) Ensure that each health care provider and nursing team providing care is licensed in this Commonwealth. The health care provider and nursing team must be capable of the following:(i) Monitoring and reviewing eligible participants' health data.(ii) Creating an escalation pathway with the participating managed care organization if an eligible participant's remote patient monitoring readings, in conjunction with the eligible participant's symptoms, require additional medical attention.(iii) Providing health coaching to eligible participants, including nutrition, condition management and healthy behavior modification.20250HB1569PN1858 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Supporting the eligible participant's health care provider in monitoring and reviewing health data.§ 54A05. Requirements for contracts with participating managed care organizations.The selected vendor shall meet the following requirements when contracting with participating managed care organizations:(1) Ensure that remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes devices are delivered to the eligible participant.(2) Ensure that the eligible participant is provided training on how to use the remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes devices. (3) Assign a program manager to support implementation and administration of the pilot program and to coordinate efforts with the participating managed care organizations and the department.§ 54A06. Implementation of pilot program.The department shall implement the pilot program as necessary to ensure participation of a statistically relevant number of eligible participants. The participating managed care organizations shall ensure that eligible participants have access to the pilot program.§ 54A07. Fee payment for administration of pilot program.(a) Fee payment.--(1) The department shall pay a fee to the participating managed care organizations to administer the pilot program.(2) The fee shall be determined by the department.(b) Use of fee.--The participating managed care organizations shall use the fee payment under subsection (a) to cover the costs of the following:20250HB1569PN1858 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Contracting with the selected vendor under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program).(2) Administering the pilot program.§ 54A08. Operation of pilot program.The pilot program shall be operational no later than 180 days from the contract date between the participating managed care organizations and the selected vendor under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program).§ 54A09. Report.Within one year of the pilot program's implementation, the department shall collaborate with the participating managed care organizations and any other relevant stakeholders to develop a report evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program, including recommendations regarding whether the pilot program should be expanded throughout this Commonwealth. The department shall submit the report to all of the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 54A10. Expiration of authority.20250HB1569PN1858 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department's authority to implement the pilot program shall expire two years after the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1569PN1858 - 7 - 123